Arkansas statutes. Title 25 State Government
Chapter 15 Administrative Procedures
25-15-208. Administrative adjudication — Procedures generally.

In every case of adjudication:

History.

Acts 1967, No. 434, § 8; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-708; Acts 1993, No. 1083, § 1; 2011, No. 717, § 1.

25-15-209. Administrative adjudication — Communication by decision maker.

Communicate with other members of the agency; and

Have the aid and advice of one (1) or more personal assistants.

History.

Acts 1967, No. 434, § 11; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-711.

25-15-210. Administrative adjudication — Decisions.

A final decision shall include findings of fact and conclusions of law, separately stated. Findings of fact, if set forth in statutory language, shall be accompanied by a concise and explicit statement of the underlying facts supporting the findings. If, in accordance with agency rules, a party submitted proposed findings of fact, the decision shall include a ruling upon each proposed finding.

History.

Acts 1967, No. 434, § 10; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-710.

25-15-211. Administrative adjudication — Licenses — Definition.

For purposes of this section, “offender” means any person sentenced to the Division of Correction or sentenced to the Division of Correction for judicial transfer to the Division of Community Correction or any person confined in a community correction center as a condition of probation, suspended imposition of sentence, or post prison transfer.

History.

Acts 1967, No. 434, § 12; 1985, No. 139, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-712; Acts 1997, No. 937, § 1; 2019, No. 910, § 1022.

25-15-212. Administrative adjudication — Judicial review.

The cost of the preparation of the record shall be borne by the agency. However, the cost of the record shall be recovered from the appealing party if the agency is the prevailing party.

By stipulation of all parties to the review proceeding, the record may be shortened. Any party unreasonably refusing to stipulate to limit the record may be taxed by the court for the additional costs.

The court may require or permit subsequent corrections or additions to the record.

History.

Acts 1967, No. 434, § 13; 1979, No. 704, § 1; 1985, No. 139, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-713; Acts 1989, No. 709, § 1; 1999, No. 778, § 1; 2001, No. 1648, § 5; 2019, No. 910, § 1023.

25-15-213. Hearings generally.

In every case of adjudication, and in cases of rule making in which rules are required by law to be made on the record after opportunity for an agency hearing, and in cases of rule making in which, pursuant to §25-15-204(a)(2), the agency shall direct that oral testimony be taken or a hearing held:

Any person compelled to appear before any agency or representative thereof shall have the right to be accompanied and advised by counsel. Every party shall have the right to appear in person or by counsel;

There shall preside at the hearing:

The agency;

One (1) or more members of the agency; or

One (1) or more examiners or referees designated by the agency.

All presiding officers and all officers participating in decisions shall conduct themselves in an impartial manner and may at any time withdraw if they deem themselves disqualified.

Any party may file an affidavit of personal bias or disqualification. The affidavit shall be ruled on by the agency and granted if timely, sufficient, and filed in good faith;

Presiding officers shall have power, pursuant to published procedural rules of the agency:

To issue subpoenas if the agency is authorized by law to issue them;

To administer oaths and affirmations;

To maintain order;

To rule upon all questions arising during the course of a hearing or proceeding;

To permit discovery by deposition or otherwise;

To hold conferences for the settlement or simplification of issues;

To make or recommend decisions; and

Generally to regulate and guide the course of the pending proceeding.

In any proceeding before any agency, if any person refuses to respond to a subpoena, refuses to take the oath or affirmation as a witness or thereafter refuses to be examined, or refuses to obey any lawful order of an agency contained in its decision rendered after hearing, the agency or the presiding officer of the agency hearing may apply to the circuit court of the county where the proceedings were held or are being held or to the circuit court of the county where a petition for judicial review was filed for an order directing that person to take the requisite action or to otherwise comply with the order of the agency. The court shall issue the order in its discretion. Should any person willfully fail to comply with an order so issued, the court shall punish him or her as for contempt;

Except as otherwise provided by law, the proponent of a rule or order shall have the burden of proof. Irrelevant, immaterial, and unduly repetitious evidence shall be excluded. Any other oral or documentary evidence, not privileged, may be received if it is of a type commonly relied upon by reasonably prudent people in the conduct of their affairs. Objections to evidentiary offers may be made and shall be noted of record. When a hearing will be expedited and the interests of the parties will not be substantially prejudiced, any part of the evidence may be received in written form;

Parties shall have the right to conduct such cross examination as may be required for a full and true disclosure of the facts; and

Official notice may be taken of judicially cognizable facts and of generally recognized technical or scientific facts within the agency's specialized knowledge. Parties shall be notified of material so noticed, including any staff memoranda or data, and shall be afforded a reasonable opportunity to show the contrary.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2001, No. 1648, was not properly engrossed. Subdivisions (3)(A)(ii) and (iii) were omitted from the act but not specifically deleted from the section. As the omission was apparently an oversight, subdivisions (3)(A)(ii) and (iii) have been retained.

This section suggests that one is entitled to a hearing in person, with “in person” meaning that the petitioner, respondent, witnesses, and the hearing officer are in one location; thus, the circuit court properly concluded that a telephone hearing was not sufficient in a case involving the placement of a name on the child maltreatment registry.Ark. Dep't of Human Servs. v. J.N., 96 Ark. App. 319, 241 S.W.3d 293 (2006).

Where board accepted statement as to the testimony of witnesses, action of board in not hearing the testimony was not prejudicial. Jones v. Reed, 267 Ark. 237, 590 S.W.2d 6 (1979).

The results of a polygraph examination were not the type of evidence commonly relied upon by reasonably prudent men in the conduct of their affairs. Baxter v. Ark. State Bd. of Dental Exmrs., 269 Ark. 67, 598 S.W.2d 412 (1980).

Testimony held admissible under subsection (4). Stringfellow v. ABC Bd., 3 Ark. App. 124, 623 S.W.2d 213 (1981).

In a prospective buyer's challenge to a vehicle manufacturer's determination that the buyer was unqualified to purchase a dealership, a hearing officer's exclusion of a letter that could have been used for impeachment purposes as to allegations of past warranty fraud was prejudicial under subdivision (5) of this section. Ford Motor Co. v. Ark. Motor Vehicle Comm'n, 357 Ark. 125, 161 S.W.3d 788 (2004).

In a case involving the revocation of an insurance license, even though challenged documents likely contained hearsay, the rules of evidence are relaxed in an administrative proceeding; moreover, the owner had the ability to subpoena witnesses to call the document preparers himself, or he could have asked for a continuance or a rehearing. Therefore, the administrative refusal to exclude the evidence outright was upheld.Dyer v. Ark. Ins. Dep't, 2015 Ark. App. 446, 468 S.W.3d 303 (2015).

Since a surveyor failed to file an affidavit of bias or disqualification under subdivision (2)(C) of this section, he forfeited any argument regarding the bias in his hearing.Gilmore v. Ark. Bd. of Registration for Prof'l Eng'rs & Land Surveyors, 2011 Ark. App. 139, 381 S.W.3d 860 (2011).

Commission was properly reversed where fairness of one of the commissioners was subject to reasonable suspicion based upon statements made in relation to the matter involved in the hearing. Arkansas Racing Comm'n v. Emprise Corp., 254 Ark. 975, 497 S.W.2d 34 (1973).

Board member held not disqualified by pronouncement prior to the conclusion of the hearing that the license should be suspended, where the comment was made after admissions of misconduct had already been made by licensee. Ark. State Medical Bd. v. Elliott, 263 Ark. 86, 563 S.W.2d 427, cert. denied, 439 U.S. 862, 99 S. Ct. 183, 58 L. Ed. 2d 171 (1978).

Based on the existence and content of an ex parte communication, particularly when viewed in conjunction with the hearing officer's actions after the discussion was brought to light, the appearance of a fair hearing was compromised and the decision was properly reversed. Madden v. United States Assocs., 40 Ark. App. 143, 844 S.W.2d 374 (1992).

Although respondent had right to appear at hearing in person or by counsel, it was not required that notice of hearing recite these rights. Thomas v. Committee “A” Thomas, 255 Ark. 517, 255 Ark. 517, 501 S.W.2d 248, 1973 Ark. LEXIS 1398 (1973).

Although this subchapter gives the respondent in an administrative proceeding the right to appear by counsel and to present and cross-examine witnesses, the administrative board is under no duty to warn respondents of such rights. Ark. State Medical Bd. v. Elliott, 263 Ark. 86, 563 S.W.2d 427, cert. denied, 439 U.S. 862, 99 S. Ct. 183, 58 L. Ed. 2d 171 (1978).

Order requiring the Arkansas Department of Health and Human Services to pay for an attorney for a child in its custody who had been accused of sexual misconduct was upheld where the child was entitled to an attorney under subdivision (1) of this section; providing the child with an attorney, in order to keep the child off the sex offender list, would greatly assist in the child's adoption.Ark. Dep't of Health & Human Servs. v. C.M., 100 Ark. App. 414, 269 S.W.3d 387 (2007).

Cited: Travelers Indem. Co. v. Monroe, 257 Ark. 1029, 522 S.W.2d 431 (1975); City of Hector v. Arkansas Soil & Water Conservation Comm'n, 47 Ark. App. 177, 888 S.W.2d 312 (1994); Capstone Oilfield Disposal of Ark., Inc. v. Pope County, 2012 Ark. App. 231, 408 S.W.3d 65 (2012).

History.

Acts 1967, No. 434, § 9; 1969, No. 82, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-709; Acts 2001, No. 1648, § 6.

25-15-214. Failure of agency to act — Action by injured party.

In any case of rule making or adjudication, if an agency shall unlawfully, unreasonably, or capriciously fail, refuse, or delay to act, any person who considers himself or herself injured in his or her person, business, or property by the failure, refusal, or delay may bring suit in the circuit court of any county in which he or she resides or does business, or in Pulaski County Circuit Court, for an order commanding the agency to act.

History.

Acts 1967, No. 434, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-707; Acts 2001, No. 1648, § 7.

25-15-215. Model rules.

The Attorney General shall publish model rules of procedure for use by agencies.

The model rules shall include general functions and duties commonly performed by agencies.

Each agency created after August 13, 2001, shall adopt, in accordance with the provisions of this subchapter, those model rules that are practicable.

Any agency that adopts a rule of procedure that differs from the model rule, in conjunction with adopting the rule of procedure, shall state the reason why the relevant portions of the model rules are impracticable.

Any existing rule should be repealed or amended; or

Any new rule should be adopted.

At the conclusion of each review, the agency shall adopt a written report of the result of the review.

A copy of each report shall be maintained as a public record by the agency.

On or before January 1 of the following year, if the newly enacted law results from a regular or fiscal session of the General Assembly;

On or before the one hundred eightieth day following sine die adjournment, if the newly enacted law results from a special session of the General Assembly; or

If approval of a rule under § 10-3-309 has not occurred by the date under subdivision (b)(1)(A) or subdivision (b)(1)(B) of this section, as soon as practicable after approval under § 10-3-309.

An agency shall file the proposed rule with the Legislative Council, or the Joint Budget Committee if the General Assembly is in regular, fiscal, or extraordinary session, under §10-3-309 sufficiently in advance of the date under subdivision (b)(1)(A) or subdivision (b)(1)(B) of this section so that the Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee may consider the rule for approval before the appropriate date.

(A)If an agency fails to file the final version of the new, amended, or repealed rule for adoption as required by subdivision (b)(1) of this section, the executive head of the agency at issue or his or her designee shall appear before the Legislative Council or its appropriate subcommittee on a monthly basis until the final version of the new, amended, or repealed rule is filed for adoption with the Secretary of State.

When appearing before the Legislative Council or its appropriate subcommittee, the executive head of the agency at issue or his or her designee shall:

Amendments. The 2009 amendment inserted “session and fiscal” in the introductory language of (a).

The 2019 amendment redesignated former (a) through (c) as (a)(1) through (a)(3); redesignated former (a)(1) and (a)(2) as (a)(1)(A) and (a)(1)(B); and added (b).

Describe why the agency has been unable to comply with subdivision (b)(1) of this section;

Provide an update on the current status of the necessary rule changes;

Describe the steps the agency is taking to address the failure to comply with subdivision (b)(1) of this section; and

Provide an anticipated date for when the final version of the new, amended, or repealed rule will be filed for adoption with the Secretary of State.

(1)Each agency which may suspend, revoke, or deny a license for acts or omissions or other conduct as provided by law may impose alternative sanctions set forth in subsection (b) of this section.

Each agency may impose on any person or entity under the agency's jurisdiction:

A licensing examination;

A credentialing examination; or

Any other examination required in order to obtain a permit, license, registration, or credential;

Conditions or restrictions upon regulated activities of the holder of a license, permit, certificate, credential, registration, or other authority; and

Other requirements or penalties as may be appropriate under the circumstances of the case and which would achieve the agency's desired disciplinary purposes, but which would not impair the public health and welfare.

The agency may file suit to collect any monetary penalty assessed pursuant to this subchapter, if the penalty is not paid within the time prescribed by the agency, in either Pulaski County Circuit Court or the circuit court of any county in which the person or entity under the agency's jurisdiction:

Resides; or

Does business.

Upon imposition of a sanction against a person or entity under the agency's jurisdiction, the agency may order that the license, permit, certification, credential, or registration be suspended until the person or entity has complied in full with all applicable sanctions imposed pursuant to this section.

Each violation shall constitute a separate violation.

The power and authority of the agency to impose a sanction authorized in this section shall not be affected by any other civil or criminal proceeding concerning the same violation.

In carrying out the codification under subdivision (a)(1)(A)(i) of this section, the bureau shall have the same powers and duties related to the Code of Arkansas Rules as the Arkansas Code Revision Commission, Code Revisor, and bureau have related to the Arkansas Code of 1987 Annotated under § 1-2-303(d)(1).

The bureau shall not make any change in the substance or meaning of any provision of a rule.

The bureau shall consult with an agency when codifying a rule of that agency.

An agency that objects to the form of the codification of a rule by the bureau may appeal the codification of the rule to the:

Legislative Council or a subcommittee of the Legislative Council designated for that purpose; or

If the General Assembly is in session, the Joint Budget Committee or a subcommittee of the Joint Budget Committee designated for that purpose;

The uniform style, format, and numbering system developed under subdivision (a)(2)(A) of this section shall conform as nearly as practical to the style of the Arkansas Code of 1987 Annotated.

Rules included in the Code of Arkansas Rules shall be cited and referred to by the numbering system established under subdivision (a)(2)(A) of this section;

Communicate to agencies the uniform style, format, and numbering system;

Cause the Code of Arkansas Rules to be published as an online searchable database that is available for use by the general public at no charge.

The online searchable database under subdivision (a)(4)(A) of this section shall:

Constitute the official version of the Code of Arkansas Rules; and

Be prima facie evidence of the rules contained in the Code of Arkansas Rules.

In no event shall the bureau be required to produce a print version of the Code of Arkansas Rules, including without limitation in response to a request under the Freedom of Information Act of 1967, § 25-19-101 et seq.;

Update the Code of Arkansas Rules at least monthly with the current version of each rule adopted by an agency; and

Indicate in bold type on the webpage of the Code of Arkansas Rules the date of the latest update.

If a rule is omitted from publication under subdivision (c)(2)(A) of this section, the Code of Arkansas Rules shall indicate where and how a copy of the omitted rule may be obtained.

(1)The bureau may enter into a professional services contract to assist in carrying out the duties under this section.

(1)The bureau may prepare guidance documents for agencies regarding matters necessary for the implementation of this section, including without limitation the:

Form and style of content that will be included in the Code of Arkansas Rules; and

Submission of information to the bureau for inclusion in the Code of Arkansas Rules.

A guidance document under subdivision (e)(1) of this section is not a rule under §25-15-202.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2019, No. 662, § 6, provided:

“(a)No later than December 31, 2019, each agency subject to §25-15-218 shall transmit to the Bureau of Legislative Research an electronic version of each rule that has been adopted and is currently in effect.

“(b)The Bureau of Legislative Research shall:

“(1)Inform each agency of the format in which rules shall be transmitted under subsection (a) of this section;

“(2)Submit a report on the status of the codification to the Legislative Council on January 1, April 1, July 1, and October 1 of each year until the codification is complete; and

“(3)Complete the codification of the Code of Arkansas Rules required in this act by January 1, 2023.

“(c)(1)To promote the efficient development of a Code of Arkansas Rules, the Bureau of Legislative Research shall work with the Governor's Office to coordinate and direct agencies in the effort to develop the Code of Arkansas Rules.

“(2)The Bureau of Legislative Research may establish a phased approach which requires agencies to submit portions of their rules before December 31, 2019”.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment rewrote the section.

(1)Each agency shall publish on the Internet the date, time, and location of all of the agency's meetings and hearings that are open to the public.

The agency shall publish the notice not less than three (3) days before the meeting or hearing is scheduled.

This section does not apply to emergency or special meetings that meet the requirements of § 25-19-106(b)(2).

As used in this section:

“State agency” includes without limitation the:

Arkansas State Game and Fish Commission, if the rule is promulgated under authority of a statute enacted by the General Assembly; and

State Highway Commission and the Arkansas Department of Transportation, if the rule is promulgated under authority of a statute enacted by the General Assembly.

This section applies to one (1) or more of the following if the Legislative Council adopts rules under § 10-3-309(h)(2) including the respective entity in the definition of “state agency” under § 10-3-309(b)(2)(A):

Each rule of the Arkansas State Game and Fish Commission;

Each rule of the State Highway Commission and the Arkansas Department of Transportation; and

An institution of higher education.

(1)The authority of a state agency to promulgate a rule when so empowered by an act of the General Assembly shall be narrowly interpreted by the state agency.

Limit its rulemaking to only those areas or subject matters that are absolutely necessary to fulfill its statutory duty or obligations; and

Not promulgate a rule that is inconsistent with the legislative intent of an act empowering a state agency to promulgate a rule.

A proposed rule that is promulgated based upon a broad interpretation of a state agency's rulemaking power rather than a narrow interpretation of that rulemaking power may be deemed as inconsistent with state law for the purposes § 10-3-309(f)(1).

A.C.R.C. Notes. Section 25-15-304 was repealed by Acts 2013, No. 759, § 5 without striking through the section to indicate its repeal.

Publisher's Notes. These sections, concerning definitions, determination of effect of proposed rule on small businesses, economic impact statement and regulatory review committee, were repealed by Acts 2013, No. 759, § 5.The sections were derived from the following sources:

25-15-301. Acts 2007, No. 143, § 1.

25-15-302. Acts 2007, No. 143, § 1.

25-15-303. Acts 2007, No. 143, § 1; 2009, No. 809, § 1.

25-15-304. Acts 2009, No. 809, § 2.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2017, No. 781, § 1, provided: “Legislative findings and determinations. The General Assembly finds and determines that it is in the best interest of this state to conduct a periodic comprehensive consideration of agency rules.”

History.

Acts 2001, No. 1648, § 8.

25-15-216. Review of agency rules.

(1)As soon as is practicable after each regular session and fiscal session of the General Assembly, each agency shall review any newly enacted laws to determine whether:

(1)If an agency determines that a newly enacted law requires the repeal or amendment of an existing rule or the adoption of a new rule and the newly enacted law does not provide a specific date for the repeal, amendment, or adoption of the rule, the final version of the new, amended, or repealed rule shall be filed for adoption with the Secretary of State:

History.

Acts 2001, No. 1648, § 8; 2009, No. 962, § 44; 2019, No. 517, § 2.

25-15-217. Alternative sanctions.

The penalties set forth in subsection (b) of this section shall be supplemental to any agency's authority to impose penalties upon any person or entity under the agency's jurisdiction.

A monetary penalty not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500) for each violation;

A requirement that the person complete appropriate education programs or courses, or both;

A requirement that the person or entity successfully complete:

History.

Acts 2001, No. 1648, § 8.

25-15-218. Code of Arkansas Rules.

The Bureau of Legislative Research shall:

(A)(i)Compile, format, and index a codification of the general and permanent rules of agencies to be known as the “Code of Arkansas Rules”.

The bureau shall not include in the Code of Arkansas Rules an emergency rule promulgated under §25-15-204(c).

(A)Develop a uniform style, format, and numbering system for the rules in the Code of Arkansas Rules.

Each agency shall draft its rules to comply with the uniform style, format, and numbering system developed by the bureau under subdivision (a)(2) of this section.

(1)Except as provided in subdivision (c)(2) of this section, a rule that is not included in the Code of Arkansas Rules is not enforceable by the agency promulgating the rule.

(A)The bureau may omit from publication in the Code of Arkansas Rules any rule in which publication would be unduly cumbersome, expensive, or otherwise impractical.

The bureau shall retain the copyright over the Code of Arkansas Rules.

History.

Acts 2003, No. 1478, § 3; 2019, No. 662, § 5.

25-15-219. Publication on the Internet — Meeting dates.

The publication shall be made at www.arkansas.gov.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 1302, § 1.

25-15-220. Rulemaking power to be narrowly interpreted — Definitions.

“Rule” means a state agency statement of general applicability and future effect that implements, interprets, or prescribes law or policy or describes the organization, procedure, or practice of a state agency; and

(A)“State agency” means an office, board, commission, department, council, bureau, governmental entity, or other agency of state government having authority to promulgate or enforce rules.

As part of the narrow interpretation of its rulemaking authority under subdivision (b)(1) of this section, a state agency shall without limitation:

History.

Acts 2019, No. 517, § 4.

Subchapter 3

— Administrative Rules That Impact Small Businesses

25-15-301 — 25-15-304. [Repealed.]

25-15-401. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

“Agency” means a board, commission, department, office, or other authority of the government of the State of Arkansas, whether within or subject to review by another agency except the General Assembly, the courts, and the Governor.

“Agency” includes the Division of Child Care and Early Childhood Education and the Child Care Appeal Review Panel for purposes of administrative appeal;

“Rule” means an agency statement of general applicability and future effect that implements, interprets, or prescribes law or policy or describes the organization, procedure, or practice of an agency, including without limitation the amendment or repeal of a prior rule.

“Rule” does not mean:

A statement that concerns the internal management of an agency and that does not affect the private rights or procedures available to the public;

A declaratory ruling issued under § 25-15-206; or

Intra-agency memoranda; and

“Rulemaking” means an agency process for the formulation, amendment, or repeal of a rule.

History.

Acts 2017, No. 781, §
2.

25-15-402. Report, sunset, and extension of rules.

Except as provided in § 25-15-403 and under subdivision (a)(2) of this section, unless a rule is extended by the Governor and the Legislative Council, an agency rule shall maintain in full force and effect for no more than twenty-four (24) years.

However, this section does not prohibit an agency from proposing, amending, or repealing a rule in an ordinary fashion under the Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act, § 25-15-201 et seq.

By December 1, 2017, each agency shall file an initial rule report with the Governor and the Legislative Council.

The initial rule report shall contain a list of all the rules in effect promulgated by the agency.

The list of rules under subdivision (b)(2)(A) of this section shall include:

The initial effective date of each rule;

The date that each rule was filed with the Secretary of State;

The authority under which the rule was promulgated; and

If the rule is required under state or federal law, a statement regarding the requirement.

By July 1, 2018, each agency shall file a final rule report and shall continue to file a rule report according to the schedule determined under § 25-15-403.

The final rule report shall contain:

A list of all rules in effect that distinguishes between rules that the agency will continue to enforce and rules that the agency wishes to repeal; and

The date that the agency filed its initial rule report under subdivision (b)(1) of this section.

The agency shall provide in writing the legal authority or agency justification for each rule that will continue to be enforced by the agency.

If the agency chooses to repeal a rule, the agency shall provide in writing the agency justification for repealing the rule.

A rule that an agency chooses to repeal under subdivision (c)(2)(C)(i) of this section is not subject to the Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act, § 25-15-201 et seq.

The final rule report shall be assigned to the subject matter interim committees by the President Pro Tempore of the Senate and the Speaker of the House of Representatives.

By December 31, 2018, each of the subject matter interim committees shall:

Consider the rules the agency wishes to repeal and the corresponding justifications submitted by the agency under subdivision (c)(2)(C) of this section;

Consider the agency rules that will continue to be enforced by the agency and the corresponding justification submitted by the agency under subdivision (c)(2)(B) of this section;

Allow an agency representative and the public to speak about the rules at an interim committee meeting;

Recommend that the Legislative Council either accept or reject the agency's decision to repeal a rule; and

Refer the agency rules that will continue to be enforced by the agency to group consideration under § 25-15-403.

Before December 31 of the fourth year of the consideration of a group of agencies under § 25-15-403, the Legislative Council shall meet on a date or dates set by the President Pro Tempore of the Senate and the Speaker of the House of Representatives to consider renewing the rules of the agencies scheduled for consideration.

If the Legislative Council does not extend an agency's rules and the result is that the agency has no rules that address an issue that the agency is required by law to address by rule, the agency has sixty (60) days to initiate the rulemaking process under the Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act, § 25-15-201 et seq., including without limitation adoption of an emergency rule.

If applicable, a final rule report under this section shall be updated by the agency to include and make note of any rule filed, amended, or repealed by the agency during the interim period of time occurring after July 1, 2018, and before it is sent to a group under § 25-15-403.

An updated final rule report shall include the date the rule was filed, amended, or repealed during the interim.

If neither the Governor nor the President Pro Tempore of the Senate and the Speaker of the House of Representatives have determined the groups by April 1, 2019, all of the state agencies shall be subject to immediate evaluation in one (1) group and:

Except as provided in § 25-15-402 concerning an initial rule report, a final rule report shall be filed by an agency:

No earlier than May 1, 2019, and no later than July 1, 2019; and

No earlier than May 1 of every twenty-fourth year after May 1, 2019, and no later than July 1 of every twenty-fourth year after July 1, 2019; and

The evaluation shall be completed no later than:

December 31, 2042; and

December 31 of every twenty-fourth year after December 31, 2042.

(1)Each group of agencies assigned under subdivision (a)(1) or subdivision (a)(2) of this section shall be evaluated in a four-year time period.

No earlier than May 1, 2019, and no later than July 1, 2019; and

No earlier than May 1 of every twenty-fourth year after May 1, 2019, and no later than July 1 of every twenty-fourth year after July 1, 2019.

Group 2 shall file a report:

No earlier than May 1, 2023, and no later than July 1, 2023; and

No earlier than May 1 of every twenty-fourth year after May 1, 2023, and no later than July 1 of every twenty-fourth year after July 1, 2023.

Group 3 shall file a report:

No earlier than May 1, 2027, and no later than July 1, 2027; and

No earlier than May 1 of every twenty-fourth year after May 1, 2027, and no later than January 1 of every twenty-fourth year after July 1, 2027.

Group 4 shall file a report:

No earlier than May 1, 2031, and no later than July 1, 2031; and

No earlier than May 1 of every twenty-fourth year after May 1, 2031, and no later than July 1 of every twenty-fourth year after July 1, 2031.

Group 5 shall file a report:

No earlier than May 1, 2035, and no later than July 1, 2035; and

No earlier than May 1 of every twenty-fourth year after May 1, 2035, and no later than July 1 of every twenty-fourth year after July 1, 2035.

Group 6 shall file a report:

No earlier than May 1, 2039, and no later than July 1, 2039; and

No earlier than May 1 of every twenty-fourth year after May 1, 2039, and no later than January 1 of every twenty-fourth year after July 1, 2039.

Agency rules that have been in effect for twenty-four (24) years or longer on August 1, 2017, shall remain in effect until the date of their first scheduled evaluation as provided under this section unless otherwise approved or rejected in accordance with the Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act, § 25-15-201 et seq.

History.

Acts 2017, No. 781, §
2.

25-15-403. Order of implementation.

(1)The agency rules shall be divided in six (6) groups to be determined by the Governor to ensure that the number of agencies in each group and the number of subject matter areas represented by each group are approximately equal.

If the Governor has not determined the groups by January 1, 2019, the President Pro Tempore of the Senate and the Speaker of the House of Representatives shall determine the six (6) groups to ensure that the number of agencies in each group and the number of subject-matter areas represented by each group are approximately equal.

Group 1 shall file a report:

History.

Acts 2017, No. 781, §
2.

Subchapter 5

— Rules Impacting Medicaid Costs

25-15-501. Legislative finding.

In light of the potential for rapidly rising costs to the state attributable to the Arkansas Medicaid Program and the importance of Medicaid expenditures to the health and welfare of the citizens of this state, the General Assembly finds that it is desirable to exercise a more thorough review of future proposed changes to any rule impacting state Medicaid costs.

History.

Acts 2017, No. 605, §
3.